Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Traffic Citations in Lieu of Arrest

7-63-101. Municipal violations — Citation or complaint in lieu of arrest.

When any person violates any traffic, or other ordinance, law or regulation of any municipal, metropolitan or city government in the presence of a:

Law enforcement officer of such government;

Member of the fire department or building department who is designated as a special police officer of the municipality; or

Transit inspector employed by a public transportation system or transit authority organized pursuant to chapter 56, part 1 of this title;

such officer or inspector may issue, in lieu of arresting the offender and having a warrant issued for the offense, a citation or complaint for such offense. A copy of such citation, which shall contain the offense charged and the time and place when such offender is to appear in court, shall be given to the offender.

Acts 1969, ch. 208, § 8; 1973, ch. 101, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-651; Acts 1993, ch. 101, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by Tenn. R. Crim. P. 3.5 concerning criminal citations.

7-63-102. Agreement by offender to appear.

In order to prevent the offender's arrest and the issuance of the warrant against the offender, the offender must sign an agreement to appear at the time and place indicated, and to waive the issuance and service of a warrant upon the offender.

Acts 1969, ch. 208, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-652.

7-63-103. Duty of court — Treatment of citation or warrant.

When the offender has signed the agreement and waiver provided for in §7-63-102, it is the duty of the court having jurisdiction to try the case, to try the same upon the citation or complaint, without the issuance or service of a warrant upon the defendant, and the citation or complaint shall in all respects be deemed and treated as though it were a warrant properly served upon the defendant.

Acts 1969, ch. 208, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-653.

7-63-104. Arrest when offender refuses to sign agreement to appear.

In the event the offender refuses to sign the agreement to appear in court and to waive the issuance and service upon the offender of a warrant, then it shall be the duty of the officer, in whose presence the offense is committed, forthwith to place the offender under arrest and take the offender before the proper authority, procure a warrant, serve the warrant upon the offender and book the offender as in other cases of violations. The authority issuing the warrant shall take bail from the accused for appearance in court for trial, or in lieu of bail, commit the offender to jail.

Acts 1969, ch. 208, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-654.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to arrest for municipal violations, OAG 94-069, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 72 (5/17/94).

A municipal officer may constitutionally arrest a person who refuses to sign a citation for a city code or ordinance violation, OAG 06-167 (11/9/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 187.

A municipal officer may arrest a person for violation of a city code or ordinance when that person fails to provide the officer with proper identification, OAG 06-167 (11/9/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 187.

7-63-105. Failure of offender to appear after signing agreement — Additional warrant.

In the event that the offender signs the agreement and waiver as provided in §7-63-102, and then fails to appear for trial at the time and place designated, then the court having jurisdiction of the case shall immediately issue a warrant against the offender for the offense, and an additional warrant for the offense of violating the agreement to appear; provided, that the municipal, metropolitan or city government has made the failure so to appear an offense, or has adopted the state law creating such offense. The warrant or warrants shall then be served upon the offender and the procedure followed as set out in §7-63-104 regarding the service of warrants, booking the defendant, and taking appearance bail or committing to jail.

Acts 1969, ch. 208, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-655.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1978).

7-63-106. Issuance of citation or complaint after investigation at scene of accident or place of violation.

All the procedures enumerated in this part as to giving citations or complaints in lieu of making arrests and taking out warrants shall also apply when the officer, as designated in §7-63-101, makes a personal investigation at the scene of a traffic accident, or makes a personal investigation at the place of violation, as a result of which the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe that the driver of any vehicle involved in the accident has violated any traffic ordinance, law or regulation of any municipal, metropolitan or city government in this state; or in the case of violations other than traffic accidents, the officer has reasonable and probable grounds to believe that the owner or occupant of property involved in a violation has violated any ordinance, law or regulation of any municipal, metropolitan or city government in this state.

Acts 1969, ch. 208, § 6; 1973, ch. 101, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-656.

7-63-107. Part inapplicable — Driving under influence — Nonresidents.

None of the provisions of this part shall apply when it appears that the offending party is guilty of driving while under influence of intoxicants or drugs, or if the offender is a nonresident of the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1969, ch. 208, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-657.

Cross-References. Driving under the influence, title 55, ch. 10, part 4.

7-63-108. Application to certain counties.

This chapter shall also apply to counties with populations of less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that have adopted a charter form of government pursuant to title 5, chapter 1, part 2.

Acts 1995, ch. 475, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.